Wisconsin, session 2025, SB147.
do enact as follows:SB147,13Section 1. 807.14 of the statutes is amended to read:SB147,1,64807.14 Interpreters. On request of any party, the court may permit an 5interpreter to act in any civil proceeding other than trial by telephone or live 6audiovisual means.SB147,27Section 2. 967.09 of the statutes is amended to read:SB147,2,28967.09 Interpreters may serve by telephone or video. On request of any 1party, the court may permit an interpreter to act in any criminal proceeding, other 2than trial, by telephone or live audiovisual means.SB147,2,33